Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202666-1428
Taxes, interest, and penalties; remittance.

All taxes, interest, and penalties collected pursuant to the International Fuel Tax Agreement Act shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Highway Trust Fund, except as otherwise provided under the act or an agreement entered into pursuant to the act.

Laws 2022, LB750, § 77.